Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.188, is amended to read: 171.188 DRIVING WHILE IMPAIRED REVOCATION AND PROHIBITION; OFF-ROAD RECREATIONAL VEHICLES AND MOTORBOATS. (a) The provisions of this chapter for revoking or canceling a driver's license or nonresident driving privilege for deleted text begin alcohol, controlled substance, or intoxicating substancedeleted text end new text begin any of the followingnew text end violations also apply to the operating privileges for off-road recreational vehicles and motorboatsnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1) alcohol, controlled substance, or intoxicating substance violations; new text end new text begin (2) manslaughter resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle; or new text end new text begin (3) criminal vehicular homicide or injury under section 609.2112, 609.2113, or 609.2114, or Minnesota Statutes 2012, section 609.21new text end . (b) Upon convictionnew text begin for any violation described in paragraph (a)new text end , the commissioner must notify a person that the person is prohibited from operating off-road recreational vehicles and motorboats for the same period that the person's driver's license or driving privilege is revoked or canceled for the deleted text begin alcohol, controlled substance, or intoxicating substancedeleted text end conviction. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to violations committed on or after that date. new text end